California statutes. Financial Code
(a) The commissioner may, as the commissioner deems necessary, require licensees to provide reports concerning their residential mortgage loan servicing activities, including, but not limited to, information similar to that collected in connection with the Mortgage Servicers Survey, first published by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation in December 2007. The commissioner is additionally authorized to seek and accept information provided on a voluntary basis by residential mortgage loan servicers not subject to the commissioner’s jurisdiction. The commissioner shall post only aggregated survey results on the department’s internet website, and shall note the number of loan servicers submitting data included in the aggregated totals and the estimated percentage of outstanding mortgage loans to Californians that
 are serviced by these loan servicers, to the extent information on the number of outstanding loans is available from a reliable source. Nothing in this section is intended to reduce or change the commissioner’s authority to request and demand reports under Sections 22150 and 22159.

(b) For purposes of this section, “mortgage loan servicing activity” means receiving more than three installment payments of principal, interest, or other amounts placed in escrow, pursuant to the terms of a mortgage loan, and performing services relating to that receipt or the enforcement of its receipt, on behalf of the holder of the note evidencing that loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 135.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22160.

The commissioner shall make and file annually with the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation as a public record a composite of the annual reports and any comments on the reports that the commissioner deems to be in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 136.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22161.

(a) A person subject to this division shall not do any of the following:

(1) Make a materially false or misleading statement or representation to a borrower about the terms or conditions of that borrower’s loan, when making or brokering the loan.

(2) Make a materially false or misleading statement or representation to a property owner about the terms or conditions of an assessment contract.

(3) Advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or broadcast, or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, or broadcast in any
 manner, any statement or representation with regard to the business subject to the provisions of this division, including the rates, terms, or conditions for making or negotiating loans, or for making or negotiating assessment contracts, that is false, misleading, or deceptive, or that omits material information that is necessary to make the statements not false, misleading, or deceptive, or in the case of a licensee, that refers to the supervision of the business by the state or any department or official of the state.

(4) Commit an act in violation of Section 1695.13 of the Civil Code.

(5) Engage in any act in violation of Section 17200 of the Business and Professions Code.

(6) Knowingly
 misrepresent, circumvent, or conceal, through subterfuge or device, any material aspect or information regarding a transaction to which the person is a party.

(7) Commit an act that constitutes fraud or dishonest dealings. 

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 57) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 58.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.

(a) A finance lender, broker, or mortgage loan originator licensee shall not place an advertisement disseminated primarily in this state for a loan unless the licensee discloses in the printed text of the advertisement, or in the oral text in the case of a radio or television advertisement, the license under which the loan would be made or arranged.

(b) A program administrator licensee shall not place an advertisement disseminated primarily in this state for an assessment contract unless the licensee discloses in the printed text of the advertisement, or in the oral text in the case of a radio or television advertisement, the license under which the assessment contract would be administered.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 59) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 60.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22163.

(a) The commissioner may require that rates of charge, if stated by a licensee, be stated fully and clearly in the manner that the commissioner deems necessary to prevent misunderstanding by prospective borrowers or property owners.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 61) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 62.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22164.

(a) If any person engaged in the business regulated by this division refers in any advertising to rates of interest, charges, or cost of loans or assessment contracts, the commissioner shall require that the rates, charges, or costs are stated fully and clearly in the manner that he or she deems necessary to give adequate information to prospective borrowers or property owners. If the rates or costs advertised do not apply to loans or assessment contracts of all classes made or negotiated by the person, this fact shall be clearly indicated in the advertisement.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 63) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 64.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22165.

No advertising copy shall be used after its use has been disapproved by the commissioner and the licensee is notified in writing of the disapproval. The commissioner may by order direct any licensee to submit advertising copy to the commissioner for review prior to use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 640, Sec. 1.   (SB 1146)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22166.

The commissioner may require licensees to maintain a file of all advertising copy for a period of two years from the date of its use. The file shall be available to the commissioner upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 640, Sec. 2.   (SB 1146)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

22167.

A licensed finance lender may act as a broker as defined in Section 22004 at its licensed place of business without obtaining an additional license as a broker under this division provided the licensee has notified the commissioner of the action in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22168.

(a) The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, suspend for a period not to exceed 12 months or bar a person from any position of employment with a licensee if the commissioner finds that the person has willfully used or claimed without authority a designation or certification of special education, practice, or skill that the person has not attained, or willfully held out to the public a confusingly similar designation or certification for the purpose of misleading the public regarding his or her qualifications or experience.

(b) Within 15 days from the date of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the person may request
 a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Upon receiving a request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after receipt unless the person subject to this division consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of the notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(c) Upon receipt of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the person who is the subject of the proposed order is immediately prohibited from engaging in any activities subject to licensure under this division.

(d) Persons suspended or barred under this section
 are prohibited from participating in any business activity of a licensed finance lender, broker, program administrator, or mortgage loan originator, and from engaging in any business activity on the premises where a licensed finance lender, broker, program administrator, or mortgage loan originator is conducting its business. This subdivision does not prohibit suspended or barred persons from having their personal transactions processed by a licensed finance lender, broker, mortgage loan originator, or program administrator.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 65) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 66.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22169.

(a) The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order, censure or suspend for a period not exceeding 12 months, or bar a person, including a mortgage loan originator, from any position of employment with, or management or control of, any finance lender, broker, program administrator, or any other person, if the commissioner finds either of the following:

(1) That the censure, suspension, or bar is in the public interest and that the person has committed or caused a violation of this division or rule or order of the commissioner, which violation was either known or should have been known by the person committing or causing it or has caused material damage to the finance lender, broker, program administrator, or mortgage loan
 originator, or to the public.

(2) That the person has been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any crime, or has been held liable in any civil action by final judgment, or any administrative judgment by any public agency, if that crime or civil or administrative judgment involved any offense involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, or any other offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in the business in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(b) Within 15 days from the date of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the person may request a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act
 (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Upon receipt of a request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after such receipt unless the person subject to this division consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of such notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(c) Upon receipt of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to this section, the person who is the subject of the proposed order is immediately prohibited from engaging in any activities subject to licensure under the law.

(d) Persons suspended or barred under this section are prohibited from participating in any business activity of a finance lender, broker, program administrator, or
 mortgage loan originator, and from engaging in any business activity on the premises where a finance lender, broker, program administrator, or mortgage loan originator is conducting business.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 100, Sec. 3.   (AB 1312)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22170.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly alter, destroy, mutilate, conceal, cover up, falsify, or make a false entry in any record, document, or tangible object with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly make
 an untrue statement to the commissioner or the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry during the course of licensing, investigation, or examination, with the intent to impede, obstruct, or influence the administration or enforcement of any provision of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 40.5.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22171.

(a) The commissioner shall apply the guidance on nontraditional mortgage product risks published on November 14, 2006, by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators, and the Statement on Subprime Mortgage Lending published on July 17, 2007, by the aforementioned entities and the National Association of Consumer Credit Administrators, to
 licensees.

(b) The commissioner may adopt emergency and final regulations to clarify the application of this section as soon as possible.

(c) A finance lender or broker licensee shall adopt and adhere to policies and procedures that are reasonably intended to achieve the objectives set forth in the documents described in subdivision (a). A mortgage loan originator licensee shall adhere to policies and procedures developed by its employer in accordance with this division and applicable federal law and regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 41.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

22172.

(a) The commissioner may do one or more of the following:

(1) Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to renew a mortgage loan originator license for a violation of this division, or any rules or regulations adopted thereunder.

(2) Deny, suspend, revoke, condition, or decline to renew a mortgage loan originator license if an
 applicant or licensee fails at any time to meet the requirements of Section 22109.1 or 22109.4, or withholds information or makes a material misstatement in an application for a license or license renewal.

(3) Order restitution against a mortgage loan originator or any finance lender or broker licensee employing a mortgage loan originator for a violation of this division.

(4) Impose fines on a mortgage loan originator or any finance lender or broker licensee employing a mortgage loan originator pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), and (d).

(5) Issue orders or directives to mortgage loan originators under this division as follows:

(A) Order or direct a mortgage loan originator or any finance lender or broker licensee employing a mortgage loan originator to
 desist and refrain from conducting business, including immediate temporary orders to desist and refrain.

(B) Order or direct a mortgage loan originator or any finance lender or broker licensee employing a mortgage loan originator to cease any harmful activities or violations of this division, including immediate temporary orders to desist and refrain.

(C) Enter immediate temporary orders to cease business under a license issued pursuant to the authority granted under Section 22100 if the commissioner determines that the license was erroneously granted or the mortgage loan originator is currently in violation of this division.

(D) Order or direct any other affirmative action as the commissioner deems necessary.

(b) The commissioner may impose a civil
 penalty on a mortgage loan originator or any finance lender or broker licensee employing a mortgage loan originator, if the commissioner finds, on the record after notice and opportunity for hearing, that the mortgage loan originator or any finance lender or broker licensee employing a mortgage loan originator has violated or failed to comply with any requirement of this division or any regulation prescribed by the commissioner under this division or order issued under authority of this division.

(c) The maximum amount of penalty for each act or omission described in subdivision (b) shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(d) Each violation or failure to comply with any directive or order of the commissioner is a separate and distinct violation or failure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 41.5.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Consumer Loans [22200. - 22470.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [22200. - 22204.]

22200.

“Charges” include the aggregate interest, fees, bonuses, commissions, brokerage, discounts, expenses, and other forms of costs charged, contracted for, or received by a licensee or any other person in connection with the investigating, arranging, negotiating, procuring, guaranteeing, making, servicing, collecting, and enforcing of a loan or forbearance of money, credit, goods, or things in action, or any other service rendered.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22201.

“Charges” include any profit or advantage of any kind that a licensee may contract for, collect, receive, or obtain by a collateral sale, purchase, or agreement, in connection with negotiating, arranging, making, or otherwise in connection with any loan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22202.

“Charges” do not include any of the following:

(a) Commissions received as a licensed insurance agent or broker in connection with insurance written as provided in Section 22313.

(b) Amounts not in excess of the amounts specified in subdivision (c) of Section 3068 of the Civil Code paid to holders of possessory liens, imposed pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 3067) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, to release motor vehicles that secure loans subject to this division.

(c) Court costs, excluding attorney’s fees, incurred in a suit and recovered against a debtor who defaults on the
 debtor’s loan.

(d) Amounts received by a licensee from a seller, from whom the borrower obtains money, goods, labor, or services on credit, in connection with a transaction under an open-end credit program that are paid or deducted from the loan proceeds paid to the seller at the direction of the borrower and that are an obligation of the seller to the licensee for the privilege of allowing the seller to participate in the licensee’s open-end credit program. Amounts received by a licensee from a seller pursuant to this subdivision may not exceed 6 percent of the loan proceeds paid to the seller at the direction of the borrower.

(e) Actual and necessary fees not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) paid in connection with the repossession of a motor vehicle to repossession agencies licensed pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and
 Professions Code provided that the licensee complies with Sections 22328 and 22329, and actual fees paid to a licensee in conformity with Sections 26751 and 41612 of the Government Code in an amount not exceeding the amount specified in those sections of the Government Code.

(f) Moneys paid to, and commissions and benefits received by, a licensee for the sale of goods, services, or insurance, whether or not the sale is in connection with a loan, that the buyer by a separately signed authorization acknowledges is optional, if sale of the goods, services, or insurance has been authorized pursuant to Section 22154.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 2.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22203.

“Consumer loan” means a loan, whether secured by either real or personal property, or both, or unsecured, the proceeds of which are intended by the borrower for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. For purposes of determining whether a loan is a consumer loan, the lender may rely on any written statement of intended purposes signed by the borrower. The statement may be a separate statement signed by the borrower, or may be contained in a loan application or other document signed by the borrower. The lender shall not be required to
 ascertain that the proceeds of the loan are used in accordance with the statement of intended purposes. Nothing in this section shall authorize the taking of real property as security, except as specified in Section 22330.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 347, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22204.

(a) In addition to the definition of consumer loan in Section 22203, a “consumer loan” also means a loan of a principal amount of less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), the proceeds of which are intended by the borrower for use primarily for other than personal, family, or household purposes.

For purposes of determining whether a loan is or is not a consumer loan, the lender may rely on any written statement of intended purposes signed by the borrower. The statement may be a separate statement
 signed by the borrower or may be contained in a loan application or other document signed by the borrower. The lender shall not be required to ascertain that the proceeds of the loan are used in accordance with the statement of intended purposes.

(b) A consumer loan under this section is a loan secured in the manner provided for in this division if it is secured, in whole or in part, by any lien on, security interest in, assignment of, or power of attorney relative to income arising from the operation of a business by the borrower, such as accounts, and chattel paper, including the right to payment for accounts or chattel paper sold by the borrower prior to or contemporaneously with the making of the loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exemptions [22250. - 22252.]

22250.

(a) The following sections do not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, or to a duly licensed finance lender in connection with any such loan or loans, if the provisions of this section are not used for the purpose of evading this division: Sections 22154, 22155, 22201, 22202, 22307, 22313, 22314, 22315, 22322, 22323, 22325, 22334, and 22752, and the sections enumerated in subdivision (b).

(b) The following sections do not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more, or to a duly licensed finance lender in connection with any such loan or loans, if the provisions of this section are not used for the purpose of evading this
 division: Sections 22300, 22305, and 22306, subdivision (a) of Section 22307, and Sections 22309, 22320.5, 22326, 22327, 22400, and 22751.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 3.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22251.

Any section that refers to this section does not apply to any loan of the bona fide principal amount specified in the regulatory ceiling provision of that section or more if that provision is not used for the purpose of evading this division. In determining under Section 22250, 22303, 22304, or 22304.5 or any section that refers to this section whether a loan is a loan of a bona fide principal amount of the amount specified in that section or more and whether the regulatory ceiling provision of that section is used for the purpose of evading this division, the following principles apply:

(a) If a borrower applies for a loan in a bona fide principal amount of less than the specified amount and a loan to that borrower of a bona fide principal amount
 of the specified amount or more is made by a licensed finance lender, no adequate economic reason for the increase in the size of the loan exists, and by prearrangement or understanding between the borrower and the licensee a substantial payment is to be made upon the loan with the effect of reducing the bona fide principal amount of the loan to less than the specified amount within a short time after the making of the loan other than by reason of a requirement that the loan be paid in substantially equal periodical installments, then the loan shall not be deemed to be a loan of the bona fide principal amount of the specified amount or more and the regulatory ceiling provisions shall be deemed to be used for the purpose of evading this division unless the loan complies with the other provisions of the section that includes the regulatory ceiling provisions.

(b) If a loan made by a licensed finance lender is in a bona fide principal amount of
 the specified amount or more, the fact that the transaction is in the form of a sale of accounts, chattel paper, goods, or instruments or a lease of goods, or in the form of an advance on the purchase price of any of the foregoing, shall not be deemed to affect the loan or the bona fides of the amount thereof or to indicate that the regulatory ceiling provisions are used for the purpose of evading this division.

(c) For the purposes of determining whether the loan amount exceeds a regulatory ceiling, the “bona fide principal amount” shall not be comprised of any charges or any other fees or recompense specified in Sections 22200, 22201, 22202, 22305, 22316, 22317, 22318, 22319, 22320, 22320.5, and 22336, or any amounts paid for insurance of the types specified in Sections 22313 and 22314, or any fees paid to a licensee for the privilege of participating in an open-end credit program. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prevent
 those specified charges, fees, and recompense that have been earned and remain unpaid in an existing loan from being considered as part of the bona fide principal amount of a new loan to refinance that existing loan, provided the new loan is not made for the purpose of circumventing a regulatory ceiling provision. This subdivision is intended to define the meaning of “bona fide principal amount” as used in this division solely for the purposes of determining whether the loan amount exceeds a regulatory ceiling, and is not intended to affect the meaning of “principal” for any other purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 4.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22252.

This chapter does not apply to a program administrator or a PACE solicitor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 475, Sec. 69.   (AB 1284)   Effective October 4, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Loan Regulations [22300. - 22347.]

22300.

No licensee shall directly or indirectly charge, contract for, or receive any interest or charge of any nature unless a loan is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22301.

(a) No licensee shall directly or indirectly charge, contract for, or receive any interest or charge of any nature with respect to a loan of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more unless the loan is made.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), whenever a loan of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more is not consummated because of the borrower’s failure to disclose outstanding liens or other information essential to making the loan or solely because of the borrower’s failure to
 complete the loan in accordance with the loan application, a licensee may charge, contract for, and receive an amount equal to the actual expenses incurred by the licensee in connection with the preparation for the loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22302.

(a) Section 1670.5 of the Civil Code applies to the provisions of a loan contract that is subject to this division.

(b) A loan found to be unconscionable pursuant to Section 1670.5 of the Civil Code shall be deemed to be in violation of this division and subject to the remedies specified in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22303.

Every licensee who lends any sum of money may contract for and receive charges at a rate not exceeding the sum of the following:

(a) Two and one-half percent per month on that part of the unpaid principal balance of any loan up to, including, but not in excess of two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225).

(b) Two percent per month on that portion of the unpaid principal balance in excess of two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) up to,
 including, but not in excess of nine hundred dollars ($900).

(c) One and one-half percent per month on that part of the unpaid principal balance in excess of nine hundred dollars ($900) up to, including, but not in excess of one thousand six hundred fifty dollars ($1,650).

(d) One percent per month on any remainder of such unpaid balance in excess of one thousand six hundred fifty dollars ($1,650).

This section does not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22251.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22304.

As an alternative to the charges authorized by Section 22303, a licensee may contract for and receive charges at the greater of the following:

(a) A rate not exceeding 1.6 percent per month on the unpaid principal balance.

(b) A rate not exceeding five-sixths of 1 percent per month plus a percentage per month equal to one-twelfth of the annual rate prevailing on the 25th day of the second month of the quarter preceding the quarter
 in which the loan is made, as established by the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco, on advances to member banks under Sections 13 and 13a of the Federal Reserve Act, as now in effect or hereafter from time to time amended, or if there is no single determinable rate for advances, the closest counterpart of this rate as shall be determined by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions. Charges shall be calculated on the unpaid principal balance.

(c) This section does not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more as determined in accordance with Section 22251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 176.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22304.5.

(a) For any loan of a bona fide principal amount of at least two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), as determined in accordance with Section 22251, a finance lender may contract for or receive charges at a rate not exceeding an annual simple interest rate of 36 percent per annum plus the Federal Funds Rate.

(b) As used in this section, “Federal Funds Rate” means the rate published by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System in its Statistical Release H.15 Selected Interest Rates and in effect as of the first day of the month immediately preceding the month during which the loan is consummated. If the Federal Reserve System ceases publication of the federal funds rate, the
 commissioner shall designate a substantially equivalent index.

(c) The following rules shall also apply to finance lenders that make loans subject to this section:

(1) The finance lender shall report each borrower’s payment performance to at least one consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis. For purposes of this section, a consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis is one that meets the definition in Section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(p)).

(A) A finance lender that is licensed under this division prior to January 1, 2020, and that is not approved as a data furnisher prior to January 1, 2020, by at least one of the consumer reporting agencies to which reporting is
 required pursuant to this section, shall obtain that approval by July 1, 2020, and, once approved, shall report borrower payment performance to that consumer reporting agency in connection with all loans originated under this section on and after January 1, 2020.

(B) A newly licensed finance lender that is not approved as a data furnisher by at least one of the consumer reporting agencies to which reporting is required pursuant to this section shall have up to one calendar year in which to obtain that approval and, once approved, shall report borrower payment performance to that consumer reporting agency in connection with all loans originated under this section on and after the lender’s date of licensure.

(2) Before disbursing loan proceeds to a borrower, the finance lender shall either offer the borrower a credit education program or seminar that has previously been reviewed and
 approved by the commissioner for use in complying with this section or offer the borrower a credit education program or seminar provided by an independent third party, which has previously been reviewed and approved by the commissioner for use in complying with this section. A credit education program or seminar may be provided in writing, electronically, or orally, but, if provided orally, shall be accompanied by written or electronic materials that a prospective borrower can retain or access following the conclusion of the program or seminar.

(3) To be eligible for approval by the commissioner for use in complying with this section, a credit education program or seminar shall, at a minimum, cover all of the following topics regarding credit scores and credit reports provided by consumer reporting agencies described in paragraph (1):

(A) The value of establishing a credit
 score.

(B) Ways to establish a credit score.

(C) Ways to improve a credit score.

(D) Factors that impact a credit score.

(E) Ways to check one’s credit score.

(F) Ways to obtain a free copy of one’s credit report.

(G) Ways to dispute an error in one’s credit report.

(4) A credit education program or seminar offered pursuant to this section shall be offered at no cost to the borrower.

(5) A borrower shall not be required to participate in a credit education program or seminar offered by a lender or
 independent third party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 5.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22305.

In addition to the charges authorized by Section 22303, 22304, or 22304.5, a licensee may contract for and receive an administrative fee, which shall be fully earned immediately upon making the loan, with respect to a loan of a bona fide principal amount of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) at a rate not in excess of 5 percent of the principal amount (exclusive of the administrative fee) or fifty dollars ($50), whichever is less, and with respect to a loan of a bona fide principal amount in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), at an amount not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75). No administrative fee may be contracted for or received in connection with the refinancing of a loan unless at least one year has elapsed since the receipt of a previous administrative fee paid
 by the borrower. Only one administrative fee may be contracted for or received until the loan has been repaid in full. For purposes of this section, “bona fide principal amount” shall be determined in accordance with Section 22251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 6.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22306.

No amount in excess of that allowed by this article shall be directly or indirectly charged, contracted for, or received by any person, and the total charges of the finance lender and broker and any other person in the aggregate shall not exceed the maximum rate provided for in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22307.

(a) Except as provided in Section 22305 and Article 4 (commencing with Section 22400), all charges on loans made under this division shall be computed and paid only as a percentage per month of the unpaid principal balance or portions thereof, and shall be so expressed in every obligation signed by the borrower. The charges on loans shall be computed on the basis of the number of days actually elapsed. For the purpose of these computations, a month is any period of 30 consecutive days.

(b) The loan contract shall provide for payment of the aggregate amount contracted to be paid in substantially equal periodical installments, the first of which shall be due not less than 15 days nor more than one month and 15 days from the date the loan is made. This subdivision shall not apply to a loan made to a graduate student at an accredited college or university while the student is actively pursuing a study program leading to a postbaccalaureate degree, or to a student loan made by an eligible lender under the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq.), or to a student loan made pursuant to the Public Health Service Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 294 et seq.).

(c) This section shall not apply to open-end loans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22307.5.

A licensee shall not charge, impose, or receive any penalty for the prepayment of a loan. This section does not apply to a loan secured by real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 708, Sec. 7.   (AB 539)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

22308.

Notwithstanding Section 22307, a licensee may contract for and receive charges on the unpaid principal balance at a single annual percentage rate, applied on the basis of the number of days actually elapsed, if the annual rate would produce a finance charge at the maturity of the contract not in excess of the finance charge resulting from the application of the graduated rates specified in Section 22303, when the loan is paid according to its terms, and charges are computed on the basis that a month is any period of 30 consecutive days, as provided in Section